Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB135.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 48.705 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A budget reserve trust fund account is hereby created in the general fund, pursuant
to KRS 45.305. The budget reserve trust fund account shall be funded through
direct appropriations, and surplus amounts as provided in subsection (2) of this
section. Moneys in the account shall remain unallotted unless required by the
provisions of this section.
(2) (a) Each fiscal year, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, within
thirty (30) days of the end of the fiscal year, the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet shall cause to be deposited to the budget reserve trust
fund account the lesser of the following amounts:
1. Fifty percent (50%) of the general fund surplus; or
2. The amount necessary from the general fund surplus to make the
balance of the budget reserve trust fund account equal to five percent
(5%) of the actual general fund receipts collected during the fiscal year
just ended, as determined by the Finance and Administration Cabinet.
(b) Any amounts to be deposited to the budget reserve trust fund account from the
general fund surplus shall be determined after the surplus has been reduced by
the amount necessary to implement the provisions of any surplus expenditure
plan authorized by KRS 48.140 and enacted as a part of a branch budget bill.
(3) If, at the close of any fiscal year, the budget reserve trust fund account has a balance
equal to or greater than five percent (5%) of the actual general fund receipts
collected during the fiscal year just ended, as determined by the Finance and
Administration Cabinet, the deposits required under subsection (2) of this section
shall be suspended for that year.
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 1/29/2026 12:23 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1495
(4) (a) Moneys in the budget reserve trust fund account may be appropriated by the
General Assembly in a regular or special session.
(b) 1. If a lapse in federal appropriations occurs due to a shutdown of the
federal government or a temporary suspension in federal funding, the
Governor may authorize the limited use of the moneys in the budget
reserve trust fund to provide for the continuity of the Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program.
2. Any moneys used under this paragraph shall be considered a
temporary loan and be repaid to the budget reserve trust fund from the
affected federal funding source within ninety (90) days of the
restoration of federal appropriations.
3. The Governor shall, within ten (10) days of authorizing the use of
moneys under this paragraph, notify the Legislative Research
Commission and the State Budget Director in a statement that
includes:
a. The amount of funds advanced;
b. The programs to which the funds were allocated; and
c. The anticipated source and timeline for repayment.
4. The Governor shall not authorize the use of more than five percent
(5%) of the total balance of the budget reserve trust fund without the
prior approval of the General Assembly.
(5) Before authorizing any allotments from the budget reserve trust fund account, the
secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall notify in writing the
Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue. The notice shall include
the amount and purpose for the proposed allotment.
(6) Within thirty (30) days of the close of each fiscal year, the secretary of the Finance
and Administration Cabinet shall report to the Interim Joint Committee on
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 1/29/2026 12:23 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1495
Appropriations and Revenue the general fund receipts collected for the fiscal year
just ended, the balance of the budget reserve trust fund account, and any amounts
deposited to the budget reserve trust fund account pursuant to the provisions of
subsection (2) of this section.
(7) All sums appropriated or deposited to the budget reserve trust fund account shall
not lapse at the close of the fiscal year but shall carry forward into the next fiscal
year.
Section 2. Whereas the continuity of the SNAP program for citizens of the
Commonwealth is necessary during a lapse in federal appropriations, an emergency is
declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor
or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 1/29/2026 12:23 PM Jacketed